Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General
§ 29-3-81.
Leasing of land classified as agricultural land.

Sixteenth section lands, or any lands granted in lieu of sixteenth section lands, classified as agricultural may be leased for the cultivation of rice, or pasturage, for a term not to exceed ten (10) years. All other sixteenth section or lieu lands classified as agricultural may be leased for a term not exceeding five (5) years. All leases of land classified as agricultural shall be for a term to expire on December 31. Except in those cases when the holder of an existing lease on agricultural land elects to re-lease such land, as authorized under this subsection, it shall be the duty of the board of education to lease the sixteenth section or lieu lands at public contract after having advertised such lands for rent in a newspaper published in the county or, if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein, for two (2) successive weeks, the first being at least ten (10) days before the public contract. The lease form and the terms so prescribed shall be on file and available for inspection in the office of the superintendent from and after the public notice by advertisement and until finally accepted by the board. However, before the expiration of an existing lease of land classified as agricultural land, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) for lands intended to be reclassified, the board of education, in its discretion and subject to the prior approval of the Secretary of State, may authorize the holder of the existing lease to re-lease the land, on no more than one (1) occasion, for a term not to exceed five (5) years and for a rental amount that is no less than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the total rental value of the existing lease. If the holder of the existing lease elects not to re-lease the land, the board of education shall publish an advertisement of agricultural land for rent which publication shall be not more than four (4) months before the expiration of the term of an existing lease of the land. An election by the holder of the existing lease not to re-lease the land shall not preclude his participation in the bidding process established under this section. Subject to the classification of the land, the board of education shall enter into a new lease on agricultural land before the expiration of an existing lease on the same land, and the new lease shall take effect on the day immediately following the day on which the existing lease expires. The board of education may require bidders to furnish bond or submit evidence of financial ability.

Bids received by the board of education in response to the advertisement shall be opened at a regular or special meeting of the board. The board of education, at its option, may reject all bids or accept the highest and best bid received in response to the advertisement, or the board of education may hold an auction among those who submitted bids in response to the advertisement. If the board of education elects to hold an auction, no bidder shall be granted any preference. The opening bid at the auction shall be highest bid received in response to the advertisement.

If, during the final year of an existing lease, the board of education notifies the holder of the existing lease that the board of education intends to reclassify the land under Section 29-3-39, the holder of the existing lease may re-lease the land for a term of five (5) years and for a rental amount that is equal to one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the total rental value of the then existing lease. Thereafter, the board of education shall have the option to proceed with the reclassification of the land or may re-lease the land for one (1) additional term of five (5) years after advertising for bids or holding an auction in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) of this section, and the new classification will be implemented upon the expiration of the then existing lease. This subsection does not apply if the board of education intends to reclassify the land under the “commercial” or “industrial” land classification based on a valid business proposal presented to and approved by the board of education.

If the board of education receives an acceptable bid in response to the advertisement and elects not to hold an auction among those submitting bids, then the holder of the existing lease may submit a second bid in an amount not less than one hundred five percent (105%) of the highest acceptable bid received if the holder of the existing lease: (i) submitted a bid in response to the advertisement; and (ii) constructed or made improvements on the leasehold premises after receiving approval of the board of education during the term of the existing lease. For purposes of this subsection, the term “improvements” shall not include any work or items that are done customarily on an annual basis in the preparing, planting, growing, cultivating or harvesting of crops or other farm products.

If the holder of the existing lease elects to submit a second bid, the board of education shall hold an auction among those who submitted bids in response to the advertisement. The opening bid at the auction shall be the second bid of the holder of the existing lease. However, no leaseholder may submit a second bid if: (i) any rent, taxes or other payment required under his lease are past due; or (ii) he is otherwise in default of any term or provision of the lease and such default has not been corrected or cured to the satisfaction of the board of education after more than thirty (30) days’ notice to the leaseholder of the default.

If an auction is held, the auction may be conducted at the meeting at which bids are opened or at a subsequent regular or special meeting. The board shall announce the time and place of the auction at the meeting at which bids are opened, and no further notice of the auction is required.

If no bid acceptable to the board of education is received after the advertisement or at auction, the board of education may lease, within ninety (90) days, the lands by private contract for an amount greater than the highest bid previously rejected in order to acquire a fair rental value for the lands. If no bids are received in response to the advertisement, the board of education may negotiate a private contract for a fair rental value, and the term of such contract shall expire on December 31 of the same calendar year in which the contract is made. The board of education may take the notes for the rent and attend to their collection. The board has the right and remedies for the security and collection of such rents given by law to the agricultural landlords.

If an existing lease is terminated before the expiration of the term originally set therein, upon finding that immediate action is necessary to prevent damage or loss to growing crops or to prevent loss of opportunity to lease the land for the current growing season, the board of education may negotiate a private contract for a fair rental value, and the term of such lease shall expire on December 31 of the same calendar year in which the contract is made.

Any holder of a lease on agricultural land that: (a) was granted before July 1, 1997; and (b) has an expiration date on or after April 1 but before December 31 during the final year of the lease term, may extend the term of such lease to December 31 next following the expiration date originally provided for in the lease. If such lease is extended, the rent for the period from the original expiration date in the lease to December 31 next following the original expiration date shall be one hundred five percent (105%) of the annual rent provided in the existing lease prorated over the period of the lease extension. At the expiration of the extended lease term or at the expiration of the original lease term if the lease holder does not extend such lease, the land shall be offered for lease as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-12; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 10; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 13; Laws, 1950, ch. 272; Laws, 1954, ch. 271; Laws, 1956, ch. 291; Laws, 1962, ch. 362; Laws, 1966, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 34; Laws, 1997, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 517, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 491, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 29-3-82.
Leasing of land not classified as agricultural land.

The following procedure shall be followed for the leasing of sixteenth section school lands or lands granted in lieu thereof which are not classified as agricultural land:

Any present leaseholder who desires to renew his lease, or any person who desires to lease sixteenth section or lieu lands, shall make application to the superintendent of education.

Upon receipt of an application for the lease of such lands, the superintendent of education shall promptly give consideration to the application and he shall record his recommendation in writing and present it to the board of education at the next regular meeting of the board.

The board of education, at its meeting, shall consider the application and recommendation of the superintendent of education and may receive any other information which it considers bearing upon the approval of the application and lease of such land. Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of an application, the board shall act on the application and if such action is favorable, the board of education shall submit to the superintendent of education a suggested lease agreement.

The superintendent of education shall then present the lease to the board of supervisors of the county where such land is located. Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the lease, the board of supervisors shall accept or reject the proposed rental amount.

If the board of supervisors accepts the lease as proposed by the board of education, the superintendent of education shall execute the lease to the applicant under the terms and conditions set forth in the lease.

If the board of supervisors refuses to accept the rental value set by the board of education in the proposed lease, the rental value of the lease shall be determined under the provisions set forth in Section 29-3-1(2).

All sixteenth section or lieu land leases shall be reduced to writing and signed in triplicate by the president of the board of supervisors, the president of the board of education and the superintendent of education. The chancery clerk shall certify one (1) copy of the lease to the superintendent of education and one (1) copy to the state land commissioner, and shall record the original on the deed records of the county, abstract the lease as a mesne conveyance, and record it on the minutes of the board of supervisors. The chancery clerk shall charge and collect from the lessee the full recording fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-83.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-83. [Codes, 1942, § 6597-13; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 14]

§ 29-3-85.
Reservation of rights in lease.

In all surface leases of sixteenth section land made by the board of education, whether such leases be original leases or extensions of existing leases, title to all timber, minerals, oil, and gas on such lands shall be reserved, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same, whether such provisions be included in the terms of any such lease or not; and no timber shall be cut and used by the lessees except for fuel and necessary repairs and improvements on the leased premises. The board of education, notwithstanding the fact that such land may have been leased for other purposes, shall have the right, from time to time, to sell all merchantable timber on such lands in the manner hereinabove provided. In all cases where surface leases were outstanding on June 28, 1958, and have at least five (5) years remaining of the term thereof wherein the right to sell timber has not been reserved, either expressly or by operation of law, the board may, by agreement with the lessee, sell such timber under the procedure herein set out. In all such cases the forestry commission shall only cause to be marked for cutting such timber as, in its judgment, should be harvested in the best interest of the reversionary estate, and the board may agree to pay to the lessee a portion of the proceeds of such sales from time to time, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) thereof after the deduction of the fifteen percent (15%) escrow money, hereinbefore mentioned, and all other costs of the sale. In any surface lease, the board of education shall reserve the right to grant or sell rights-of-way across any of said land for a road, highway, railroad, or any public utility line, provided only that the leaseholder be paid a reasonable rental for the unexpired term of his lease by the grantee of such right-of-way. If any surface lessee of any such sixteenth section land shall commit, cause to be committed, or permit the commission of any act of waste on any sixteenth section lands under lease to such lessee, then such lease shall thereupon, as to such lessee, cease and terminate and shall thenceforth be null and void; and the board of education shall have the right to institute an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to secure the cancellation of same of record, to recover damages for such waste, and to maintain an action in ejectment to recover possession of the same. To this end, the board of education is hereby authorized and empowered to employ competent counsel to institute and maintain any such action or actions on behalf of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-18; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 18; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 35; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 29-3-87.
Reservation of lands for school building site, public park, or recreational area.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this or any other statute, the several boards of education are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion and by resolution spread upon the minutes, to set aside, reserve, and dedicate any available sixteenth section lands or lands in lieu thereof for use by such school district as a site for school buildings, which such dedication and reservation shall be for such length of time, not exceeding fifty (50) years, and upon such terms and conditions as the board of education, in its discretion, shall deem proper. Any such reservation or dedication of sixteenth section lands shall automatically cease and terminate if, at any time, the land involved shall cease to be used for the purpose for which the dedication or reservation is made. The reservation or dedication shall cover the surface of said lands only and shall not prevent the board of education from leasing said lands for oil, gas, and mineral exploration and development in a manner otherwise provided by law.

In the same manner and subject to the same provisions hereinabove set forth the board of education having a timber management and marketing agreement with the state forestry commission or National Forest Service, may set aside, reserve and dedicate any available sixteenth section lands or lands granted in lieu thereof, which has been classified as forest land under the provisions of Section 29-3-31 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, to be utilized for public parks and recreation areas. The board of supervisors or the governing authorities of any municipality wherein such lands or any portion thereof lie may expend any funds otherwise available for park or recreational areas in the construction and maintenance of improvements to be located thereon.

The setting aside, reservation and dedication of any such sixteenth section lands, or lands granted in lieu thereof by a board of education to the state park commission for the purpose of locating a state park thereon may be for a length of time not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years.

No sixteenth section or lieu land which is subject to an existing lease shall be set aside, dedicated, and reserved as a school building site or for public park or recreational purposes under the provisions of this section unless the school district involved shall acquire the unexpired leasehold interest from the leaseholder, or unless such lease and leasehold interest shall be surrendered and relinquished by the leaseholder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-19; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 19; Laws, 1974, ch. 546, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-88.
Acquisition of land for construction of school buildings or structures.

The board of education is authorized and empowered to acquire in its own name by purchase, contribution or otherwise all land situated in its district within sixteenth section or lieu lands and under a lease contract which shall be necessary and desirable in connection with the construction of any public school building or structure. If the board shall be unable to agree with the lessee of any such land in connection with any such project, the board shall have the power and authority to acquire any such land by condemnation proceedings in the manner otherwise provided by law and, for such purpose, the right of eminent domain is hereby conferred upon and vested in said board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-89.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-89. [Codes, 1942, § 6597.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 268]

§ 29-3-91.
Compensation for easement or right of way exception.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever the United States or any agency thereof, or the state or any agency or subdivision thereof, or any private organization, corporation, association, or person acquires, by condemnation or otherwise, any easement or right-of-way across any sixteenth section land or lieu land, then adequate compensation therefor shall be paid by the party acquiring the same to the board of education concerned; and the sum or sums so received shall be placed in the principal fund or funds of the school district or districts concerned.

If the local board of education, by resolution duly adopted and spread upon its minutes, determines that a new road is necessary to provide access to and on sixteenth section land or lieu land, that the new road will enhance the value of the sixteenth section land or lieu land, and requests that a county or city construct and maintain the road, then, upon agreement by the county or city to bear all costs of construction and maintenance, the local board of education may provide a right-of-way for the new road without compensation from the county or city if the initial cost of constructing the new road exceeds the value of the right-of-way. The local board of education shall have sole discretion in determining the location of any new road constructed under the authority of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to state road projects or to any change or improvement to or relocation of existing roads under the jurisdiction of a county or city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-20; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 20; Laws, 1964, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 37; Laws, 1999, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 1999).

§ 29-3-92.
Purchase of easements for access to sixteenth section or lieu lands; use of eminent domain to acquire easement access prohibited.

The school board of a school district may acquire, in the name of the district, by purchase, all easements that are necessary and desirable for access to sixteenth section lands or lieu lands.Whenever the purchase price for property on which an easement is to be located is greater than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), the school board may not purchase the property for an amount exceeding the fair market value of the property, as determined by the average of at least two (2) independent appraisals by certified general appraisers licensed by the State of Mississippi.

In no event shall eminent domain be used against any private land owner by any local school board or local governing authority to acquire easement access to sixteenth section lands or lieu lands.If a landowner objects or refuses to sell an easement right in his or her property to the local school board, the board shall seek another means to gain access to those lands that does not interfere with the landowner’s quiet use and enjoyment of his or her property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§§ 29-3-93 through 29-3-97.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-93. [Codes, 1930, § 6761; 1942, § 6599; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1954, ch. 256, § 1].

§29-3-95. [Codes, 1942, § 6599.3; Laws, 1954, ch. 256, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 160].

§29-3-97. [Codes, 1942, § 6606-11; Laws, 1956, ch. 272, §§ 1-3].

§ 29-3-99.
Leases for oil, gas and mineral exploration, mining, production and development.

The board of education is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to let, demise and lease sixteenth section lands, included in the Choctaw Purchase, or the lands held in lieu of same whether located therein or elsewhere, reserved for the support of township schools, for exploration, mining, production and development by any method of oil, gas, and minerals, including (a) oil, gas, carbon dioxide and other gaseous substances, (b) metals, compounds of metals, or metal-bearing ores, (c) coal, including anthracite, bituminous, subbituminous, lignite and their constituent components and products and minerals intermingled or associated therewith, and (d) sulphur, salt, sand, gravel, fill dirt and clay, upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the board of education, in its discretion, shall deem proper and advisable. Such leasing shall, except as hereinafter provided, be done by competitive bids only, made upon at least three (3) weeks public notice given by advertisement in a newspaper published in the county wherein such lands are situated, or if no newspaper be published in said county then in a newspaper having general circulation therein. Such advertisement shall give an accurate legal description of the lands to be leased, inviting sealed proposals thereon to be filed with the superintendent of education. Before bids are requested, the board shall prescribe the form of the lease and shall prescribe the royalty to be retained by the lessor, the annual rental to be paid by the lessee during the primary term of the lease, and shall have as subject to bid only the bonus to be paid by lessee, and, for leases of coal, the bonus to be paid by lessee for any renewal term as hereinafter provided. The lease form and the terms so prescribed shall be on file and available for inspection in the office of the superintendent from and after the public notice by advertisement and until finally accepted by the board. The board of education shall award the lease to the highest bidder in the manner provided by law. Said school lands shall not be leased for oil, gas, and minerals, including metals, compounds of metals, or metal-bearing ores, coal and clay, exploration, mining, production, and development for a bonus of less than One Dollar ($1.00) per acre and a renewal rental or renewal bonus of less than One Dollar ($1.00) per acre per annum during the primary term. Such lands shall not be leased for oil, gas, and other minerals for a primary term of more than five (5) years and so long thereafter as oil, gas or other minerals are being produced and mined from said lands, or so long as the lease is being maintained by other lease provisions, except that a lease shall in no event extend longer than permitted by Section 211 of the Mississippi Constitution. Such lands shall not be leased for coal for a primary term of more than twenty (20) years and so long thereafter as coal is being mined and sold or utilized by lessee from such lands or from adjoining lands within a mine plan which includes such lands or so long as mining operations are being prosecuted on such lands on a continuous basis; provided, however, that any lease of coal may provide for one (1) renewal term of not more than twenty (20) years from and after expiration of the initial term upon payment by lessee of a renewal bonus of not less than One Dollar ($1.00) per acre. Any mine plan referred to in this paragraph shall not contain more than five thousand (5,000) acres. The royalties to be paid shall not be less than (a) on oil, one-eighth (1/8) of that produced and saved from said lands; (b) on gas, including casinghead gas or other gaseous substances produced from said land and sold or used off the premises or in the manufacture of gasoline or other products therefrom, the market value at the well of one-eighth (1/8) of the amount realized from such sale; (c) on coal mined on such land and sold or utilized by lessee, one-twentieth (1/20) of the market value at the mine of each ton of two thousand (2,000) pounds; (d) on all other minerals produced, mined and marketed, one-sixteenth (1/16) either in kind or value at the well or mine at lessor’s election, except that on sulphur mined and marketed, the royalty shall be not less than Fifty Cents (50¢) per long ton, except, further, that on salt the royalty shall be not less than Five Cents (5¢) per ton mined. Lessee shall have free use of oil, gas, coal, and water from said land, except water from lessor’s wells, unless lessor shall agree in writing to the use of water from lessor’s wells, for all operations hereunder, and the royalty on oil, gas, and coal shall be computed after deducting any so used. In leasing said lands for the mining and removal of clay, sand, gravel and fill dirt, the bid shall be by the cubic yard truck measure and to the highest and best bidder, provided that these materials shall not be sold therefrom for less than the regular market price thereof, such price to include the value of the royalty provided for herein. The board of education shall not lease any sixteenth section land that was sold and conveyed in fee simple forever by a board of supervisors prior to 1890.

It is further specifically provided that such leases shall not be let at a special meeting of the board of education.

Leases for metals, coals, sand, gravel, fill dirt or clay may be executed covering land upon which leases are outstanding for the exploration, mining, and development of oil, gas, and other minerals, provided proper safeguards are incorporated in the lease for the protection of the other leaseholders. All such leases shall contain suitable provisions for adequate compensation to the surface lessee, if any, for any damage done to the leasehold estate in such lands and for the use of a substantial portion of the surface thereof for such mining and/or developing or processing purposes, and for rights of ingress and egress, and all such leases shall further contain suitable provisions for adequate compensation to the board of education for any permanent damage done to the surface of the land or any timber thereon. Any future lease of said land after expiration of the present lease thereon will be subject to the rights of any lessee under provisions hereof.

If the lessor commits any error in the leasing procedure which renders the lease void or voidable, the lessee shall be entitled to recover the consideration paid to secure the lease.

No clay shall be leased nor removed within the boundary of any incorporated municipality as such boundary existed on January 1, 1964, nor within one hundred fifty (150) feet of any dwelling house which is either occupied or has been vacant less than ninety (90) days, without the written consent of the leaseholder of the surface from which such clay is to be leased or removed, regardless of classification of such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6762; 1942, § 6600; Laws, 1926, ch. 318; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1942, ch. 150; Laws, 1962, ch. 363; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 19; Laws, 1964, ch. 406; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 39; Laws, 1981, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1993, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1993).

§ 29-3-101.
Rights of mineral lessee.

Every such lease shall empower the lessee to enter upon the premises leased and explore and develop such premises for oil, gas, or either of them, or such other mineral as may be included in the terms of said lease, and to do all things necessary or expedient for the production and preservation of any of such products; and shall inure to the lessee, his heirs or assigns.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6763; 1942, § 6601; Laws, 1926, ch. 318; Laws, 1930, ch. 278.

§ 29-3-103.
Confirmation of leases.

Any person holding or claiming any sixteenth section school land under a lease or extension thereof made by the board of education or by their authority or direction, may proceed by bill in chancery court to have such lease or extension thereof confirmed and quieted. He shall set forth in his bill his claim for title under the lease or extension thereof which he asks to have confirmed, the date of such lease or extension, to whom made, the consideration, and the amount paid and to be paid, if any. The superintendent of education of the district in which the bill is filed and in which the land may be located shall be made a party defendant, and process shall be served on him as in other cases in chancery. Such suits shall be brought in the county in which the sixteenth section or some part thereof is located, and shall be proceeded with as in other cases in chancery, except that the bill shall not be taken as confessed; and it shall be competent for the court to hear and consider evidence aliunde the records of the board of education as to whether the lease or extension thereof sought to be confirmed was legally made and whether the complainant is entitled to relief. If it is clearly proven that the requirements of law regulating such leases or extensions thereof were complied with, the proper relief shall be granted even though the records contain no such affirmative showing. The party claiming title under such lease or extension thereof shall be entitled to the benefits of this section whether the suit be filed by him or by the school district, as required by this chapter.

The provisions of statute made by Sections 29-3-105 and 29-3-107 shall fully apply under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6775; 1942, § 6616; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1950, ch. 366; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-105.
Decree of confirmation.

Should the court be of the opinion that the complainant is entitled to relief, it shall decree a confirmation of the lease under which complainant claims and fix the date of its commencement and termination; and such decree shall vest in the complainant a good and perfect title to the term of the lease for the time fixed in such decree. Nothing in this or the preceding sections shall be construed as releasing any person from the payment in full of any balance that may be due on any lease under which he may claim or hold any or all of such sixteenth section school lands, but he must either pay or tender in court any balance that may be due as aforesaid before the relief prayed for shall be granted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6776; 1942, § 6617; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278.

§ 29-3-107.
Illegal leases.

Should it appear to the court that the lease under which the complainant holds or claims title was illegally made and void, then the court may proceed to have an account stated of the amount of money, principal and interest which has actually been paid in consideration for such lease by the complainant and those under whom he may claim, and an account of the rents, issues and profits arising from said land, less the cost of any necessary, permanent, valuable, and not ornamental improvements made upon said land, and may decree any excess of money paid and interest and cost of improvements over the rent, issues, and profits to complainants. Such decree shall be a lien upon the rents, issues and profits accrued or to accrue from the particular sixteenth section involved in such suit until the same is fully paid and satisfied. Upon the rendition of such decree, the secretary of the board of education shall issue a warrant for the amount decreed to be paid to the complainant against the funds of such sixteenth section, and the same shall be paid out of the first available money to the credit of such funds. Any excess in the amount of the rents, issues and profits, after deducting the cost of improvements and amount paid by complainant, shall be decreed against him, together with a writ of possession in favor of the defendant. All court costs in suits brought shall be paid by the party or parties seeking relief under the provisions hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6777; 1942, § 6618; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-109.
Crediting of funds derived from lands.

All expendable funds derived from sixteenth section or lieu lands shall be credited to the school districts of the township in which such sixteenth section lands may be located, or to which any sixteenth section lieu lands may belong. Such funds shall not be expended except for the purpose of education of the educable children of the school district to which they belong, or as otherwise may be provided by law.

The board of education shall require additional securities from the county depository when necessary to protect such funds and, in the event of their failure so to do, they shall be liable therefor upon their official bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-111.
Expenditure of moneys derived from lands.

All moneys heretofore or hereafter derived from the leasing of said lands for oil, gas and mineral purposes, including any bonus or delay rental payable under such leases, and all moneys derived from the annual payment of rents from the leasing of said lands for agricultural, residential, commercial, industrial, grazing or other purposes, or derived as interest upon loans or investments of principal funds, and all moneys heretofore or hereafter derived from the sale of timber, may be expended for any of the purposes authorized by law. In cases where said moneys have been transferred to the principal fund and it is determined to expend same for any of the purposes authorized by law, such moneys shall be transferred to the proper fund for expenditure upon order of the board of education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-113.
Investment and lending of funds.

The principal fund shall be a permanent township fund which shall consist of funds heretofore or hereafter derived from certain uses or for certain resources of school trust lands which shall be invested and, except as otherwise provided in this section, only the interest and income derived from such funds shall be expendable by the school district.

The principal fund shall consist of:

Funds received for easements and rights-of-way pursuant to Section 29-3-91;

Funds received for sales of lieu land pursuant to Sections 29-3-15 through 29-3-25;

Funds received from any permanent damage to the school trust land;

Funds received from the sale of nonrenewable resources including, but not limited to, the sale of sand, gravel, dirt, clays and royalties received from the sale of mineral ores, coal, oil and gas;

Funds received from the sale of buildings pursuant to Section 29-3-77;

Funds received from the sale of timber; and

Funds received pursuant to Section 29-3-23(2).

It shall be the duty of the board of education to keep the principal fund invested in any direct obligation issued by or guaranteed in full as to principal and interest by the United States of America or in certificates of deposit issued by a qualified depository of the State of Mississippi as approved by the State Treasurer. The certificates of deposit may bear interest at any rate per annum which may be mutually agreed upon but in no case shall said rate be less than that paid on passbook savings.

The board of education is authorized to invest the funds in interest bearing deposits or other obligations of the types described in Section 27-105-33 or in any other type investment in which any other political subdivision of the State of Mississippi may invest, except that one hundred percent (100%) of the funds are authorized to be invested. For the purposes of investment, the principal fund of each township may be combined into one or more district accounts; however, the docket book of the county superintendent shall at all times reflect the proper source of such funds. Provided that funds received from the sale of timber shall be placed in a separate principal fund account, and may be expended for any of the purposes authorized by law.

The board of education shall have authority to borrow such funds at a rate of interest not less than four percent (4%) per annum and for a term not exceeding twenty (20) years, for the erection, equipment or repair of said district schools, to provide local funds for any building project approved by the State Board of Education or to provide additional funds for forest stand improvement as set forth in Section 29-3-47. In addition, the board may borrow the funds under the same interest restrictions for a term not exceeding ten (10) years to provide funds for the purchase of school buses. The board of education of any school district in any county that has an aggregate amount of assets in its principal fund in excess of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), may deduct an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) for the purpose of covering the cost of asbestos removal from school district buildings. Such asbestos removal shall be construed to constitute the repair of school district facilities as prescribed in Section 29-3-115.

No school land trust funds may be expended after the annual payment date until the payment is made on such loan. The annual payment can be made from any funds available to the school district except minimum foundation program funds.

It shall be unlawful for the board of education to borrow any sixteenth section school funds in any other manner than that prescribed herein, and if any such funds shall be borrowed or invested in any other manner, any officer concerned in making such loan and investment or suffering the same to be made in violation of the provisions of this section, shall be liable personally and on his official bond for the safety of the funds so loaned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6764; 1942, § 6602; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1934, ch. 270; Laws, 1938, ch. 239; Laws, 1940, ch. 187; Laws, 1942, ch. 158; Laws, 1954, ch. 278; Laws, 1960, ch. 309; Laws, 1972, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 43; Laws, 1988, ch. 332; Laws, 1990, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.